Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-922
Oil and Gas Conservation Trust Fund; receipts; disbursements; investment.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special fund to be known as the Oil and Gas Conservation Trust Fund. All sums of money received by the Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, in a manner other than as provided in sections 57-901 to 57-921, shall be paid into the state treasury and the State Treasurer shall deposit the money in the Oil and Gas Conservation Trust Fund. The State Treasurer shall disburse the money in the trust fund as directed by resolution of the Nebraska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission. All disbursements for the fund shall be made upon warrants drawn by the Director of Administrative Services. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1973, LB 119, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1082, § 16.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.